New York, session 2025-2026, S10148.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 2 of subdivision (a) of section 1642 of the vehi- 2 cle and traffic law is amended to read as follows: 3 2. Parking, standing, stopping and backing of vehicles, except in 4 violation of subparagraph b of paragraph two of subdivision (a) of 5 section twelve hundred two of this chapter. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01912-01-5